New Mexico, session 2026, SB227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] CRUELTY TO ANIMALS AND EXTREME CRUELTY TO ANIMALS REGISTRY--PUBLICATION OF REGISTRY.-- A. A person convicted pursuant to Section 30-18-1 NMSA 1978 shall register with the county sheriff for the county in which the person resides. When the person initially registers with the county sheriff, the person shall provide: (1) the person's legal name and other names or aliases the person is using or has used; (2) the person's date of birth; (3) the person's social security number; (4) the person's current physical and mailing address; (5) the offense for which the person was convicted; (6) the person's telephone number; (7) any professional licenses held by the person; and (8) a photograph of the person. B. A county sheriff shall maintain a local registry of those required to register pursuant to Subsection A of this section. C. The department shall maintain a central available registry of those required to register pursuant to Subsection A of this section. D. The department shall establish and manage a report on the department's website that provides the public with information regarding who has registered pursuant to Subsection A of this section. The website shall provide: (1) the person's legal name and any other names or aliases the person is using or has used; (2) the offenses for which the person has been convicted; and (3) a photograph of the person. E. When a person required to register pursuant to Subsection A of this section changes residence to a new county in New Mexico, the person shall register with the county sheriff of the new county no later than five business days after establishing the new residence. F. The court in which the person was convicted shall provide the person with a written notice of the person's duty to register pursuant to the provisions of Subsection A of this section. G. The department shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. H. As used in this section: (1) "department" means the department of public safety; and (2) "person" means a person eighteen years of age or older. - 3 -